Hawaii statutes.
§262-1 Definitions. As used in this
chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Airport" means any area of land or
water designed and set aside for the landing and taking-off of all aircraft and
utilized or to be utilized in the interest of the public for such purposes;

"Airport hazard" means any structure
or tree which obstructs the air space required for the flight of aircraft in
landing or taking-off at an airport, or any use of land which creates a
dangerous condition, including the placement of strong lights which blind
pilots during such operations;

"Airport hazard area" means any area
of land or water upon which an airport hazard might be established if not
prevented as provided in this chapter;

"Airport protection" means protection
against an airport hazard;

"Department" means the department of
transportation;

"Director" means the director of
transportation or the director's authorized representative;

"Person" means any individual,
partnership, corporation, unincorporated association, joint stock association,
or any trustee, receiver, assignee, or other similar representative thereof; or
the State or any of its political subdivisions, or agencies thereof;

"Structure" means any object
constructed or installed by humans, including, but without limitation,
buildings, towers, smokestacks, chimneys, and overhead transmission lines;

"Tree" means any object of natural
growth. [L 1965, c 140, pt of §1; Supp, §17A-1; HRS §262-1; gen ch 1985, 1993]

Revision Note

Numeric designations deleted and definitions rearranged.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next